California statutes. Labor Code
(3) A physician may refer a person to a health facility for any service classified as an emergency under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code. For nonemergency outpatient diagnostic imaging services performed with equipment for which, when new, has a commercial retail price of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) or more, the referring physician shall obtain a service preauthorization from the insurer, or self-insured employer. Any oral authorization shall be memorialized in writing within five business days.

(d) A physician compensated or employed
 by a university may refer a person to any facility owned or operated by the university, or for a physician service, to another physician employed by the university, provided that the facility or university does not compensate the referring physician for the patient referral. For nonemergency diagnostic imaging services performed with equipment that, when new, has a commercial retail price of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) or more, the referring physician shall obtain a service preauthorization from the insurer or self-insured employer. An oral authorization shall be memorialized in writing within five business days. In the case of a facility which is totally or partially owned by an entity other than the university, but which is staffed by university physicians, those physicians may not refer patients to the facility if the facility compensates the referring physician for those referrals.

(e) The prohibition of Section 139.3 shall not
 apply to any service for a specific patient that is performed within, or goods that are supplied by, a physician’s office, or the office of a group practice. Further, the provisions of Section 139.3 shall not alter, limit, or expand a physician’s ability to deliver, or to direct or supervise the delivery of, in-office goods or services according to the laws, rules, and regulations governing his or her scope of practice. With respect to diagnostic imaging services performed with equipment that, when new, had a commercial retail price of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) or more, or for physical therapy services, or for psychometric testing that exceeds the routine screening battery protocols, with a time limit of two to five hours, established by the administrative director, the referring physician obtains a service preauthorization from the insurer or self-insured employer. Any oral authorization shall be memorialized in writing within five business days.

(f) The prohibition of Section 139.3 shall not apply where the physician is in a group practice as defined in Section 139.3 and refers a person for services specified in Section 139.3 to a multispecialty clinic, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code. For diagnostic imaging services performed with equipment that, when new, had a commercial retail price of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) or more, or physical therapy services, or psychometric testing that exceeds the routine screening battery protocols, with a time limit of two to five hours, established by the administrative director, performed at the multispecialty facility, the referring physician shall obtain a service preauthorization from the insurer or self-insured employer. Any oral authorization shall be memorialized in writing within five business days.

(g) The requirement for
 preauthorization in Sections (c), (e), and (f) shall not apply to a patient for whom the physician or group accepts payment on a capitated risk basis.

(h) The prohibition of Section 139.3 shall not apply to any facility when used to provide health care services to an enrollee of a health care service plan licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(i) The prohibition of Section 139.3 shall not apply to an outpatient surgical center, as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 139.3, where the referring physician obtains a service preauthorization from the insurer or self-insured employer after disclosure of the financial relationship.

(j) The prohibition of Section 139.3 shall not
 apply to a physician’s financial interest in a retailer of prescription drugs sold by a physical retail outlet commonly accessed by the public or a mail-order pharmacy serving a broad national or regional market, provided that the majority of the physician’s practice, with regard to income, time, and number of patients, does not relate to occupational medicine and the physician receives no remuneration from the retailer of prescription drugs to market or otherwise solicit occupational injury or occupational disease patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 545, Sec. 3.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

139.32.

(a) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Financial interest in another entity” means, subject to subdivision (h), either of the following:

(A) Any type of ownership, interest, debt, loan, lease, compensation, remuneration, discount, rebate, refund, dividend, distribution, subsidy, or other form of direct or indirect payment, whether in money or otherwise, between the interested party and the other entity that the employee is referred for services.

(B) An agreement, debt instrument, or lease or rental agreement between the interested
 party and the other entity that provides compensation based upon, in whole or in part, the volume or value of the services provided as a result of referrals.

(2) “Interested party” means any of the following:

(A) An injured employee.

(B) The employer of an injured employee, and, if the employer is insured, its insurer.

(C) A claims administrator, that includes, but is not limited to, a self-administered workers’ compensation insurer, a self-administered self-insured employer, a self-administered joint powers authority, a self-administered legally uninsured employer, a third-party claims administrator for an insurer, a self-insured employer, a joint powers
 authority, or a legally uninsured employer or a subsidiary of a claims administrator.

(D) An attorney-at-law or law firm that is representing or advising an employee regarding a claim for compensation under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200).

(E) A representative or agent of an interested party, including either of the following:

(i) An employee of an interested party.

(ii) An individual acting on behalf of an interested party, including the immediate family of the interested party or of an employee of the interested party. For purposes of this clause, immediate family includes spouses, children, parents, and spouses of children.

(F) A provider of medical services or products.

(3) “Services” means, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) A determination regarding an employee’s eligibility for compensation under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200), that includes both of the following:

(i) A determination of a permanent disability rating under Section 4660.

(ii) An evaluation of an employee’s future earnings capacity resulting from an occupational injury or illness.

(B) Services to review the itemization of medical services set forth on a medical bill submitted
 under Section 4603.2.

(C) Copy and document reproduction services.

(D) Interpreter services.

(E) Medical services, including the provision of medical products such as surgical hardware or durable medical equipment.

(F) Transportation services.

(G) Services in connection with utilization review pursuant to Section 4610.

(b) (1) All interested parties shall disclose to a third-party payer or other entity to whom a claim for
 payment is presented for services furnished pursuant to a referral, a financial interest in an entity providing services.

(2) The disclosure pursuant to this subdivision shall be made in writing, at the time the claim for payment is presented for services furnished pursuant to a referral.

(c) Except as otherwise permitted by law, it is unlawful for an interested party other than a claims administrator or a network service provider to refer a person for services provided by another entity, or to use services provided by another entity, if the other entity will be paid for those services pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and the interested party has a financial interest in the other
 entity.

(d) (1) It is unlawful for an interested party to enter into an arrangement or scheme, such as a cross-referral arrangement, that the interested party knows, or should know, has a purpose of ensuring referrals by the interested party to a particular entity that, if the interested party directly made referrals to that other entity, would be in violation of this section.

(2) It is unlawful for an interested party to offer, deliver, receive, or accept any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage, dividend, discount, or other consideration, whether in the form of money or otherwise, as compensation or inducement to refer a person for services.

(e) A claim for payment shall not be
 presented by an entity to any interested party, individual, third-party payer, or other entity for any services furnished pursuant to a referral prohibited under this section.

(f) An insurer, self-insurer, or other payer shall not knowingly pay a charge or lien for any services resulting from a referral for services or use of services in violation of this section.

(g) (1) A violation of this section shall be misdemeanor. If an interested party is a corporation, any director or officer of the corporation who knowingly concurs in a violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The appropriate licensing authority for any person subject to this section shall review the facts and circumstances of any conviction pursuant to this section and take
 appropriate disciplinary action if the licensee has committed unprofessional conduct, provided that the appropriate licensing authority may act on its own discretion independent of the initiation or completion of a criminal prosecution. Violations of this section are also subject to civil penalties of up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each offense, which may be enforced by the Insurance Commissioner, Attorney General, or a district attorney.

(2) For an interested party, a practice of violating this section shall constitute a general business practice that discharges or administers compensation obligations in a dishonest manner, which shall be subject to a civil penalty under subdivision (e) of Section 129.5.

(3) For an interested party who is an attorney, a violation
 of subdivision (b) or (c) shall be referred to the Board of Governors of the State Bar of California, which shall review the facts and circumstances of any violation pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) and take appropriate disciplinary action if the licensee has committed unprofessional conduct.

(4) Any determination regarding an employee’s eligibility for compensation shall be void if that service was provided in violation of this section.

(h) The following arrangements between an interested party and another entity do not constitute a “financial interest in another entity” for purposes of this section:

(1) A loan between an interested party and another entity, if the loan has commercially reasonable terms, bears
 interest at the prime rate or a higher rate that does not constitute usury, and is adequately secured, and the loan terms are not affected by either the interested party’s referral of any employee or the volume of services provided by the entity that receives the referral.

(2) A lease of space or equipment between an interested party and another entity, if the lease is written, has commercially reasonable terms, has a fixed periodic rent payment, has a term of one year or more, and the lease payments are not affected by either the interested party’s referral of any person or the volume of services provided by the entity that receives the referral.

(3) An interested party’s ownership of the corporate investment securities of another entity, including shares, bonds, or other debt instruments
 that were purchased on terms that are available to the general public through a licensed securities exchange or NASDAQ.

(i) The prohibitions described in this section do not apply to any of the following:

(1) Services performed by, or determinations of compensation issues made by, employees of an interested party in the course of that employment.

(2) A referral for legal services if that referral is not prohibited by the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar.

(3) A physician’s referral that is exempted by Section 139.31 from the prohibitions prescribed by Section 139.3.

(j) This section does
 not preclude the applicability of any other law that applies or may apply to a transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 640, Sec. 1.   (AB 1398)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

139.4.

(a) The administrative director may review advertising copy to ensure compliance with Section 651 of the Business and Professions Code and may require qualified medical evaluators to maintain a file of all advertising copy for a period of 90 days from the date of its use. Any file so required to be maintained shall be available to the administrative director upon the administrative director’s request for review.

(b) No advertising copy shall be used after its use has been disapproved by the administrative director and the qualified medical evaluator has been notified in writing of the disapproval.

(c) A qualified medical evaluator who is found by the administrative director to have violated any provision of this section may be terminated, suspended, or placed on probation.

(d) Proceedings to determine whether a violation of this section has occurred shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) The administrative director shall adopt regulations governing advertising by physicians with respect to industrial injuries or illnesses. 

(f) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to alter the application of Section 651 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 639, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

139.43.

(a) No person or entity shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast in any manner, any statement concerning services or benefits to be provided to an injured worker, that is paid for directly or indirectly by that person or entity and is false, misleading, or deceptive, or that omits material information necessary to make the statement therein not false, misleading, or deceptive.

(b) As soon as reasonably possible, but not later than January 1, 1994, the administrative director shall adopt regulations governing advertising by persons or entities other than physicians and attorneys with respect to services or benefits for injured workers. In promulgating regulations pursuant to this subdivision, the administrative director shall review existing regulations, including those adopted by the State Bar, to identify those regulatory approaches that may serve as a model for regulations required by this subdivision.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor, punishable by incarceration in the county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

(d) This section shall not apply to physicians or attorneys. It is the intent of the Legislature to exempt physicians and attorneys from this section because the conduct regulated by this section, with respect to physicians and attorneys, is governed by other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

139.45.

(a) In promulgating regulations pursuant to Sections 139.4 and 139.43, the administrative director shall take particular care to preclude any advertisements with respect to industrial injuries or illnesses that are false or mislead the public with respect to workers’ compensation. In promulgating rules with respect to advertising, the State Bar and physician licensing boards shall also take particular care to achieve the same goal.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), false or misleading advertisements shall include advertisements that do any of the following:

(1) Contain an untrue statement.

(2) Contain any matter, or present or arrange any matter in a manner or format that is false, deceptive, or that tends to confuse, deceive, or mislead.

(3) Omit any fact necessary to make the statement made, in the light of the circumstances under which the statement is made, not misleading.

(4) Are transmitted in any manner that involves coercion, duress, compulsion, intimidation, threats, or vexatious or harassing conduct.

(5) Entice a person to respond by the offering of any consideration, including a good or service but excluding free medical evaluations or treatment, that would be provided either at no charge or for less than market value. No free medical evaluation or treatment shall be offered for the purpose of defrauding any entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 639, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

139.47.

The Director of Industrial Relations shall establish and maintain a program to encourage, facilitate, and educate employers to provide early and sustained return to work after occupational injury or illness. The program shall do both of the following:

(a) Develop educational materials and guides, in easily understandable language in both print and electronic form, for employers, health care providers, employees, and labor unions. These materials shall address issues including, but not limited to, early return to work, assessment of functional abilities and limitations, development of appropriate work restrictions, job analysis, worksite modifications, assistive equipment and devices, and available resources.

(b) Conduct training for employee and employer organizations and health care providers concerning the accommodation of injured employees and the prevention of reinjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

139.48.

(a) There is in the department a return-to-work program administered by the director, funded by one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) annually derived from non-General Funds of the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, for the purpose of making supplemental payments to workers whose permanent disability benefits are disproportionately low in comparison to their earnings loss. Moneys shall remain available for use by the return-to-work program without respect to the fiscal year.

(b) Eligibility for payments and the amount of payments shall be determined by regulations adopted by the director, based on findings from studies conducted by the director in consultation with the Commission on Health and
 Safety and Workers’ Compensation. Determinations of the director shall be subject to review at the trial level of the appeals board upon the same grounds as prescribed for petitions for reconsideration.

(c) This section shall apply only to injuries sustained on or after January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 37.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

139.5.

(a) (1) The administrative director shall contract with one or more independent medical review organizations and one or more independent bill review organizations to conduct reviews pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4. The independent review organizations shall be independent of any workers’ compensation insurer or workers’ compensation claims administrator doing business in this state. The administrative director may establish additional requirements, including conflict-of-interest standards, consistent with the purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4, that an organization shall be required to meet in order to qualify as an independent review organization and to
 assist the division in carrying out its responsibilities.

(2) To enable the independent review program to go into effect for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2013, and until the administrative director establishes contracts as otherwise specified by this section, independent review organizations under contract with the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to Section 1374.32 of the Health and Safety Code may be designated by the administrative director to conduct reviews pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4. The administrative director may use an interagency agreement to implement the independent review process beginning January 1, 2013. The administrative director may initially contract directly with the same organizations that are under contract with the Department of Managed Health Care on substantially the same terms without competitive bidding until January 1, 2015.

(b) (1) The independent medical review organizations and the medical professionals retained to conduct reviews shall be deemed to be consultants for purposes of this section.

(2) There shall be no monetary liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any consultant on account of any communication by that consultant to the administrative director or any other officer, employee, agent, contractor, or consultant of the Division of Workers’ Compensation, or on account of any communication by that consultant to any person when that communication is required by the terms of a contract with the administrative director pursuant to this section and the consultant does all of the following:

(A) Acts without malice.

(B) Makes a reasonable effort to determine the facts of the matter communicated.

(C) Acts with a reasonable belief that the communication is warranted by the facts actually known to the consultant after a reasonable effort to determine the facts.

(3) The immunities afforded by this section shall not affect the availability of any other privilege or immunity which may be afforded by law. This section shall not be construed to alter the laws regarding the confidentiality of medical records.

(c) (1) An organization contracted to perform independent medical review or independent bill review shall be required to employ a medical director who shall be responsible for advising the contractor on clinical issues. The medical director shall be a physician and surgeon licensed by the Medical
 Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(2) The independent review organization, any experts it designates to conduct a review, or any officer, director, or employee of the independent review organization shall not have any material professional, familial, or financial affiliation, as determined by the administrative director, with any of the following:

(A) The employer, insurer or claims administrator, or utilization review organization.

(B) Any officer, director, employee of the employer, or insurer or claims administrator.

(C) A physician, the physician’s medical group, the physician’s independent practice association, or other provider involved in the medical treatment in dispute.

(D) The facility or institution at which either the proposed health care service, or the alternative service, if any, recommended by the employer, would be provided.

(E) The development or manufacture of the principal drug, device, procedure, or other therapy proposed by the employee whose treatment is under review, or the alternative therapy, if any, recommended by the employer.

(F) The employee or the employee’s immediate family, or the employee’s attorney.

(d) The independent review organizations shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The organization shall not be an affiliate or a subsidiary of, nor in any way be owned or controlled by, a workers’ compensation insurer, claims
 administrator, or a trade association of workers’ compensation insurers or claims administrators. A board member, director, officer, or employee of the independent review organization shall not serve as a board member, director, or employee of a workers’ compensation insurer or claims administrator. A board member, director, or officer of a workers’ compensation insurer or claims administrator or a trade association of workers’ compensation insurers or claims administrators shall not serve as a board member, director, officer, or employee of an independent review organization.

(2) The organization shall submit to the division the following information upon initial application to contract under this section and, except as otherwise provided, annually thereafter upon any change to any of the following information:

(A) The names of all stockholders and owners of more than 5 percent
 of any stock or options, if a publicly held organization.

(B) The names of all holders of bonds or notes in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), if any.

(C) The names of all corporations and organizations that the independent review organization controls or is affiliated with, and the nature and extent of any ownership or control, including the affiliated organization’s type of business.

(D) The names and biographical sketches of all directors, officers, and executives of the independent review organization, as well as a statement regarding any past or present relationships the directors, officers, and executives may have with any employer, workers’ compensation insurer, claims administrator, medical provider network, managed care organization, provider group, or board or committee of an employer,
 workers’ compensation insurer, claims administrator, medical provider network, managed care organization, or provider group.

(E) (i) The percentage of revenue the independent review organization receives from expert reviews, including, but not limited to, external medical reviews, quality assurance reviews, utilization reviews, and bill reviews.

(ii) The names of any workers’ compensation insurer, claims administrator, or provider group for which the independent review organization provides review services, including, but not limited to, utilization review, bill review, quality assurance review, and external medical review. Any change in this information shall be reported to the department within five business days of the change.

(F) A description of the review process, including, but not
 limited to, the method of selecting expert reviewers and matching the expert reviewers to specific cases.

(G) A description of the system the independent medical review organization uses to identify and recruit medical professionals to review treatment and treatment recommendation decisions, the number of medical professionals credentialed, and the types of cases and areas of expertise that the medical professionals are credentialed to review.

(H) A description of how the independent review organization ensures compliance with the conflict-of-interest requirements of this section.

(3) The organization shall demonstrate that it has a quality assurance mechanism in place that does all of the following:

(A) Ensures that any medical professionals retained
 are appropriately credentialed and privileged.

(B) Ensures that the reviews provided by the medical professionals or bill reviewers are timely, clear, and credible, and that reviews are monitored for quality on an ongoing basis.

(C) Ensures that the method of selecting medical professionals for individual cases achieves a fair and impartial panel of medical professionals who are qualified to render recommendations regarding the clinical conditions and the medical necessity of treatments or therapies in question.

(D) Ensures the confidentiality of medical records and the review materials, consistent with the requirements of this section and applicable state and federal law.

(E) Ensures the independence of the medical professionals or bill reviewers
 retained to perform the reviews through conflict-of-interest policies and prohibitions, and ensures adequate screening for conflicts of interest, pursuant to paragraph (5).

(4) Medical professionals selected by independent medical review organizations to review medical treatment decisions shall be licensed physicians, as defined by Section 3209.3, in good standing, who meet the following minimum requirements:

(A) The physician shall be a clinician knowledgeable in the treatment of the employee’s medical condition, knowledgeable about the proposed treatment, and familiar with guidelines and protocols in the area of treatment under review.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the physician shall hold a nonrestricted license in any state of the United States, and for physicians and surgeons holding an M.D. or D.O. degree,
 a current certification by a recognized American medical specialty board in the area or areas appropriate to the condition or treatment under review. The independent medical review organization shall give preference to the use of a physician licensed in California as the reviewer.

(C) The physician shall have no history of disciplinary action or sanctions, including, but not limited to, loss of staff privileges or participation restrictions, taken or pending by any hospital, government, or regulatory body.

(D) Commencing January 1, 2014, the physician shall not hold an appointment as a qualified medical evaluator pursuant to Section 139.2.

(5) Neither the expert reviewer, nor the independent review organization, shall have any material professional, material familial, or material financial affiliation with any of the
 following:

(A) The employer, workers’ compensation insurer or claims administrator, or a medical provider network of the insurer or claims administrator, except that an academic medical center under contract to the insurer or claims administrator to provide services to employees may qualify as an independent medical review organization provided it will not provide the service and provided the center is not the developer or manufacturer of the proposed treatment.

(B) Any officer, director, or management employee of the employer or workers’ compensation insurer or claims administrator.

(C) The physician, the physician’s medical group, or the independent practice association proposing the treatment.

(D) The institution at which the treatment would be
 provided.

(E) The development or manufacture of the treatment proposed for the employee whose condition is under review.

(F) The employee or the employee’s immediate family.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(A) “Material familial affiliation” means any relationship as a spouse, child, parent, sibling, spouse’s parent, or child’s spouse.

(B) “Material financial affiliation” means any financial interest of more than 5 percent of total annual revenue or total annual income of an independent review organization or individual to which this subdivision applies. “Material financial affiliation” does not include payment by the employer to
 the independent review organization for the services required by the administrative director’s contract with the independent review organization, nor does “material financial affiliation” include an expert’s participation as a contracting medical provider where the expert is affiliated with an academic medical center or a National Cancer Institute-designated clinical cancer research center.

(C) “Material professional affiliation” means any physician-patient relationship, any partnership or employment relationship, a shareholder or similar ownership interest in a professional corporation, or any independent contractor arrangement that constitutes a material financial affiliation with any expert or any officer or director of the independent review organization. “Material professional affiliation” does not include affiliations that are limited to staff privileges at a health facility.

(e) The division shall provide, upon the request of any interested person, a copy of all nonproprietary information, as determined by the administrative director, filed with it by an independent review organization under contract pursuant to this section. The division may charge a fee to the interested person for copying the requested information.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that the services described in this section are of such a special and unique nature that they must be contracted out pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 19130 of the Government Code. The Legislature further finds and declares that the services described in this section are a new state function pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 107.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

139.6.

(a) The administrative director shall establish and effect within the Division of Workers’ Compensation a continuing program to provide information and assistance concerning the rights, benefits, and obligations of the workers’ compensation law to employees and employers subject thereto. The program shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The preparation, publishing, and as necessary, updating, of guides to the California workers’ compensation system for employees and employers. The guides shall detail, in easily understandable language, the rights and obligations of employees and employers, the procedures for obtaining benefits, and the means provided for resolving disputes. Separate guides may be prepared for employees and employers. The appropriate guide shall be provided to all labor and employer organizations known to the administrative director, and to any other person upon request.

(2) The preparation, publishing, and as necessary, updating, of a pamphlet advising injured workers of their basic rights under workers’ compensation law, and informing them of rights under the Americans with Disabilities Act, and the provisions of the Fair Employment and Housing Act relating to individuals with a disability. The pamphlet shall be written in easily understandable language. The pamphlet shall be available in both English and Spanish, and shall include basic information concerning the circumstances under which injured employees are entitled to the various types of workers’ compensation benefits, the protections against discrimination because of an injury, the procedures for resolving any disputes which arise, and the right to seek information and advice from an information and assistance officer or an attorney.

(b) In each district office of the division, the administrative director shall appoint an information and assistance officer, and any other deputy information and assistance officers as the work of the district office may require. The administrative director shall provide office facilities and clerical support appropriate to the functions of these information and assistance officers.

(c) Each information and assistance officer shall be responsible for the performance of the following duties:

(1) Providing continuing information concerning rights, benefits, and obligations under workers’ compensation laws to injured workers, employers, lien claimants, and other interested parties.

(2) Upon request by the injured worker, assisting in the prompt resolution of misunderstanding, disputes, and controversies arising out of claims for compensation, without formal proceedings, in order that full and timely compensation benefits shall be furnished. In performing this duty, information and assistance officers shall not be responsible for reviewing applications for adjudication or declarations of readiness to proceed. This function shall be performed by workers’ compensation judges. This function may also be performed by settlement conference referees upon delegation by the appeals board.

(3) Distributing any information pamphlets in English and Spanish as are prepared and approved by the administrative director to all inquiring injured workers and any other parties that may request copies of these pamphlets.

(4) Establishing and maintaining liaison with the persons located in the geographic area served by the district office, with other affected state agencies, and with organizations representing employees, employers, insurers, and the medical community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 121, Sec. 23.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board [140. - 147.6.]

140.

(a) There is in the Department of Industrial Relations, the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board which consists of seven members who shall be appointed by the Governor. Two members shall be from the field of management, two members shall be from the field of labor, one member shall be from the field of occupational health, one member shall be from the field of occupational safety and one member shall be from the general public. Members representing occupational safety and health fields and the public member shall be selected from other than the fields of management or labor.

(b) Terms of office for members of the Industrial Safety Board shall expire 60 days after the effective date of the amendment of this section enacted at the 1973–74 Regular Session. Newly appointed members of the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board shall assume their duties upon that date.

(c) The Governor shall designate the chairman of the board from the membership of the board. The person so designated shall hold the office of chairman at the pleasure of the Governor. The chairman shall designate a member of the board to act as chairman in his absence.

(d) As used in this chapter, “board” means the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.

(e) All references in this or any other code to the Industrial Safety Board shall be deemed to mean the Occupational Safety and Health Standards
 Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

141.

(a) The terms of office of the members of the board shall be four years and they shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of a successor. The terms of the members of the board first appointed shall expire as follows: three members, one representative from management, one representative from labor, and one representative from occupational health, on June 1, 1974; three members, one representative from management, one representative from labor, and one representative from occupational safety, on June 1, 1975; one member June 1,
 1976. The terms shall thereafter expire in the same relative order. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment to the unexpired term.

(b) Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of his or her actual attendance at meetings of the board, and other official business of the board, and his or her actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duty as a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 254.   Effective January 1, 2005.)